Hawaii statutes.
[§188-22.7] Miloli‘i fisheries management
area. The Miloli‘i fisheries management area, as defined in the
administrative rules of the department of land and natural resources, shall be
designated a community-based subsistence fishing area, as provided in section
188-22.6. The department of land and natural resources shall adopt management
strategies and other rules consistent with section 188-22.6 that:

(1) Ensure long-term sustainable populations of fish
and other marine species; and

(2) Encourage the scientific study and understanding
of subsistence fishing management. [L 2005, c 232, §2]

Law Journals and Reviews

Propagating Cultural Kīpuka: The Obstacles and
Opportunities of Establishing a Community-Based Subsistence Fishing Area. 31
UH L. Rev. 193.

Method is Irrelevant: Allowing Native Hawaiian Traditional
and Customary Subsistence Fishing to Thrive. 32 UH L. Rev. 203.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next